Utah statutes.
49-14-502.   Death of active member in Division B -- Payment of benefits.
(1)  If an active member of this system enrolled in Division B under Section
49-14-301 dies, benefits are payable as follows:
(a)  If the death is classified by the office as a line-of-duty death, the
spouse at the time of death shall receive a lump sum of $1,500 and an
allowance equal to 37.5% of the member's final average monthly salary.
(b)  If the death is not classified by the office as a line-of-duty death,
benefits are payable as follows:
(i)  If the member has accrued two or more years of public safety service
credit at the time of death, the death is considered a line-of-duty death and
the benefit shall be paid as provided under Subsection (1)(a).
(ii)  If the member has accrued less than two years of public safety service
credit at the time of death, the spouse at the time of death shall receive a
refund of the member's member contributions, plus 50% of the member's most
recent 12 months' compensation.
(c) (i)  If the member has accrued two or more years of public safety service
credit at the time of death, each of the member's unmarried children to age 18
or dependent unmarried mentally or physically disabled children shall receive
a monthly allowance of $50.
(ii)  Payments shall be made to the surviving parent or to a duly appointed
guardian, or as otherwise provided under Sections 49-11-609 and 49-11-610.
(2)  In the event of the death of both parents, the spouse's benefit shall be
prorated and paid to each of the member's unmarried children to age 18.
(3)  If a benefit is not distributed under the previous subsections, and the
member has designated a beneficiary, the member's member contributions shall
be paid to the beneficiary.
(4)  The combined annual payments made to the beneficiaries of any member
under this section may not exceed 75% of the member's final average monthly
salary.
